District of Columbia statutes.
4-203.04

Assignment to public institution by Mayor.

The Mayor shall not assign any child regardless of age to any public institution except that any such child who requires medical treatment may be assigned to a hospital or other medical facility for such treatment or unless ordered to such rehabilitative institution as a court of competent jurisdiction may direct.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 304, 29 DCR 1060

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-203.4.